test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-muohta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - muohta: # N_ODD_OPEN
    muohta+N+Sg+Nom: muohta
    muohta+N+Sg+Gen: muahttaga
    muohta+N+Sg+Acc: muahttagav
    muohta+N+Sg+Ill: muahttagij
    muohta+N+Sg+Ine: muahttagin
    muohta+N+Sg+Ela: [muahttagist, muahttagis]
    muohta+N+Sg+Com: muahttagijn
    muohta+N+Pl+Nom: muahttaga
    muohta+N+Pl+Gen: muahttagij
    muohta+N+Pl+Acc: muahttagijt
    muohta+N+Pl+Ill: muahttagijda
    muohta+N+Pl+Ine: muahttagijn
    muohta+N+Pl+Ela: [muahttagijst, muahttagijs]
    muohta+N+Pl+Com: [muahttagij, muahttagijgum]
    muohta+N+Ess: muahttagin
    muohta+N+Abe: muahttagahtá

 
 
